New York, session 2025-2026, S256.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 852 of the general municipal law, as amended by 2 chapter 630 of the laws of 1977, the first undesignated paragraph as 3 amended by chapter 747 of the laws of 2005, the second undesignated 4 paragraph as amended by chapter 478 of the laws of 2011 and the third 5 undesignated paragraph as amended by section 4 of part X of chapter 59 6 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 7 § 852. Policy and purposes of article. It is hereby declared to be the 8 policy of this state to promote the economic welfare, recreation oppor- 9 tunities and prosperity of its inhabitants and to actively promote, 10 attract, encourage and develop recreation, economically sound commerce 11 and industry and economically sound projects identified and called for 12 to implement a state heritage area management plan as provided in title 13 G of the parks, recreation and historic preservation law through govern- 14 mental action for the purpose of preventing unemployment and economic 15 deterioration by the creation of industrial development agencies which 16 are hereby declared to be governmental agencies and instrumentalities 17 and to grant to such industrial development agencies the rights and 18 powers provided in this article. 19 It is hereby further declared to be the policy of this state to 20 protect and promote the health of the inhabitants of this state by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01111-02-5 S. 256--A 2 1 conservation, protection and improvement of the natural and cultural or 2 historic resources and environment and to control land, sewer, water, 3 air, noise or general environmental pollution derived from the operation 4 of industrial, manufacturing, warehousing, commercial, recreation, horse 5 racing facilities, railroad facilities, automobile racing facilities and 6 research facilities and to grant such industrial development agencies 7 the rights and powers provided by this article with respect to indus- 8 trial pollution control facilities. 9 It is hereby further declared to be the policy of this state to 10 protect and promote the health of the inhabitants of this state and to 11 increase trade through promoting the development of facilities to 12 provide recreation for the citizens of the state and to attract tourists 13 from other states, to increasing housing stock in support of the state's 14 housing goals as may be established and amended from time to time and to 15 promote the development of renewable energy projects to support the 16 state's renewable energy goals as may be established or amended from 17 time to time. 18 The use of all such rights and powers is a public purpose essential to 19 the public interest, and for which public funds may be expended. 20 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 854 of the general municipal law, as 21 amended by section 5 of part X of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 (4) "Project" - shall mean any land, any building or other improve- 24 ment, and all real and personal properties located within the state of 25 New York and within or outside or partially within and partially outside 26 the municipality for whose benefit the agency was created, including, 27 but not limited to, machinery, equipment and other facilities deemed 28 necessary or desirable in connection therewith, or incidental thereto, 29 whether or not now in existence or under construction, which shall be 30 suitable for manufacturing, warehousing, research, commercial, renewable 31 energy, housing or industrial purposes or other economically sound 32 purposes identified and called for to implement a state designated urban 33 cultural park management plan as provided in title G of the parks, 34 recreation and historic preservation law and which may include or mean 35 an industrial pollution control facility, a recreation facility, educa- 36 tional or cultural facility, a horse racing facility, a railroad facili- 37 ty, a renewable energy project, housing facility, or an automobile 38 racing facility, provided, however, no agency shall use its funds or 39 provide financial assistance in respect of any project wholly or 40 partially outside the municipality for whose benefit the agency was 41 created without the prior consent thereto by the governing body or 42 bodies of all the other municipalities in which a part or parts of the 43 project is, or is to be, located, and such portion of the project 44 located outside such municipality for whose benefit the agency was 45 created shall be contiguous with the portion of the project inside such 46 municipality. 47 § 3. The opening paragraph of section 858 of the general municipal 48 law, as amended by section 6 of part X of chapter 59 of the laws of 49 2021, is amended to read as follows: 50 The purposes of the agency shall be to promote, develop, encourage and 51 assist in the acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, main- 52 taining, equipping and furnishing industrial, manufacturing, warehous- 53 ing, commercial, research, renewable energy, housing, and recreation 54 facilities including industrial pollution control facilities, educa- 55 tional or cultural facilities, railroad facilities, horse racing facili- 56 ties, automobile racing facilities, renewable energy projects, housing S. 256--A 3 1 facilities and continuing care retirement communities, provided, howev- 2 er, that, of agencies governed by this article, only agencies created 3 for the benefit of a county and the agency created for the benefit of 4 the city of New York shall be authorized to provide financial assistance 5 in any respect to a continuing care retirement community, and thereby 6 advance the job opportunities, health, general prosperity and economic 7 welfare of the people of the state of New York and to improve their 8 recreation opportunities, prosperity and standard of living; and to 9 carry out the aforesaid purposes, each agency shall have the following 10 powers: 11 § 4. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 5 of section 859-a of the general 12 municipal law, as amended by section 7 of part X of chapter 59 of the 13 laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 14 (b) a written cost-benefit analysis by the agency that identifies the 15 extent to which a project will create or retain permanent, private 16 sector jobs; the estimated value of any tax exemptions to be provided; 17 the amount of private sector investment generated or likely to be gener- 18 ated by the proposed project; the contribution of the project to the 19 state's renewable energy goals and emission reduction targets as set 20 forth in the state energy plan adopted pursuant to section 6-104 of the 21 energy law; the contribution of the project to the state's housing goals 22 of increasing housing options including but not limited to affordable, 23 workforce, and senior housing; the likelihood of accomplishing the 24 proposed project in a timely fashion; and the extent to which the 25 proposed project will provide additional sources of revenue for munici- 26 palities and school districts; and any other public benefits that might 27 occur as a result of the project; 28 § 5. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 874 of the general 29 municipal law, as amended by chapter 44 of the laws of 2025, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 (a) The agency shall establish a uniform tax exemption policy, with 32 input from affected tax jurisdictions, which shall be applicable to the 33 provision of financial assistance pursuant to section eight hundred 34 fifty-nine-a of this title and shall provide guidelines for the claiming 35 of real property, mortgage recording, and sales tax exemptions. Such 36 guidelines shall include, but not be limited to: period of exemption; 37 percentage of exemption; types of projects for which exemptions can be 38 claimed; procedures for payments in lieu of taxes and instances in which 39 real property appraisals are to be performed as a part of an application 40 for tax exemption; in addition, agencies shall in adopting such policy 41 consider such issues as: the extent to which a project will create or 42 retain permanent, private sector jobs; the estimated value of any tax 43 exemptions to be provided; whether affected tax jurisdictions shall be 44 reimbursed by the project occupant if a project does not fulfill the 45 purposes for which an exemption was provided; the impact of a proposed 46 project on existing and proposed businesses and economic development 47 projects in the vicinity; the amount of private sector investment gener- 48 ated or likely to be generated by the proposed project; the demonstrated 49 public support for the proposed project; the likelihood of accomplishing 50 the proposed project in a timely fashion; the effect of the proposed 51 project upon the environment; the extent to which the project will 52 utilize, to the fullest extent practicable and economically feasible, 53 resource conservation, energy efficiency, green technologies, and alter- 54 native and renewable energy measures; the extent to which the project 55 will provide onsite child care services or otherwise facilitate new 56 child care services; the extent to which the project will bring addi- S. 256--A 4 1 tional housing units to the market; the extent to which the proposed 2 project will require the provision of additional services, including, 3 but not limited to additional educational, transportation, police, emer- 4 gency medical or fire services; and the extent to which the proposed 5 project will provide additional sources of revenue for municipalities 6 and school districts. 7 § 6. Subdivision 5 of section 1951 of the public authorities law, as 8 amended by chapter 907 of the laws of 1972, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 5. The term "project" shall mean any land in one or more areas of the 11 city and any building, structure, facility or other improvement thereon, 12 including, but not limited to machinery and equipment and all real and 13 personal property deemed necessary in connection therewith, whether or 14 not now in existence or under construction, which shall be necessary or 15 suitable for manufacturing, warehousing, research, commercial, housing 16 or industrial purposes and which may include or mean an industrial 17 pollution control facility. 18 § 7. The opening paragraph of section 1953 of the public authorities 19 law, as amended by chapter 579 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read 20 as follows: 21 The purposes of the authority shall be to promote, develop, encourage 22 and assist in the acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, 23 maintaining, equipping and furnishing industrial, manufacturing, ware- 24 house, commercial, housing and research facilities including industrial 25 pollution control facilities, transportation facilities including but 26 not limited to those relating to water, highway, rail and air, in one or 27 more areas of the city, particularly but not exclusively at the site of 28 what was formerly the Troy airport including an airstrip or airport 29 located in the southern section of the city and thereby advance the job 30 opportunities, health, general prosperity and economic welfare of the 31 people of said city and to improve their standard of living; provided, 32 however, that the authority shall not undertake any project if the 33 completion thereof would result in the removal of an industrial or manu- 34 facturing plant of the project occupant from one area of the state to 35 another area of the state or in the abandonment of one or more plants or 36 facilities of the project applicant located within the state, provided, 37 however, that neither restriction shall apply if the authority shall 38 determine on the basis of the application before it that the project is 39 reasonably necessary to discourage the project occupant from removing 40 such other plant or facility to a location outside the state or is 41 reasonably necessary to preserve the competitive position of the project 42 occupant in its respective industry. Except as otherwise provided for in 43 this section, no financial assistance of the authority shall be provided 44 in respect of any project where facilities or property that are primari- 45 ly used in making retail sales to customers who personally visit such 46 facilities constitute more than one-third of the total project cost. For 47 the purposes of this article, "retail sales" shall mean: (i) sales by a 48 registered vendor under article twenty-eight of the tax law primarily 49 engaged in the retail sale of tangible personal property, as defined in 50 subparagraph (i) of paragraph four of subdivision (b) of section eleven 51 hundred one of the tax law; or (ii) sales of a service to such custom- 52 ers. Except, however, that tourism destination projects shall not be 53 prohibited by this paragraph. For the purpose of this paragraph, "tour- 54 ism destination" shall mean a location or facility which is likely to 55 attract a significant number of visitors from outside the economic S. 256--A 5 1 development region as established by section two hundred thirty of the 2 economic development law in which the project is located. 3 § 8. Subdivision 1 of section 1963-a of the public authorities law, as 4 amended by chapter 44 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 1. The authority shall establish a uniform tax exemption policy, with 7 input from affected local taxing jurisdictions, which shall be applica- 8 ble to provisions of financial assistance pursuant to section nineteen 9 hundred fifty-three-a of this title and shall provide guidelines for the 10 claiming of real property, mortgage recording, and sales tax exemptions. 11 Such guidelines shall include, but not be limited to: period of 12 exemption; percentage of exemption; types of projects for which 13 exemptions can be claimed; procedures for payments in lieu of taxes and 14 instances in which real property appraisals are to be performed as a 15 part of an application for tax exemption; in addition, the authority in 16 adopting such policy shall consider such issues as: the extent to which 17 a project will create or retain permanent, private sector jobs; the 18 estimated value of any tax exemption to be provided; whether affected 19 tax jurisdictions should be reimbursed by the project occupant if a 20 project does not fulfill the purposes for which an exemption was 21 provided; the impact of a proposed project on existing and proposed 22 businesses and economic development projects in the vicinity; the amount 23 of private sector investment generated or likely to be generated by the 24 proposed project; the demonstrated public support for the proposed 25 project; the likelihood of accomplishing the proposed project in a time- 26 ly fashion; the effect of the proposed project upon the environment; the 27 extent to which the project will utilize, to the fullest extent practi- 28 cable and economically feasible, resource conservation, energy efficien- 29 cy, green technologies, and alternative and renewable energy measures; 30 the extent to which the project will provide onsite child care services 31 or otherwise facilitate new child care services; the extent to which the 32 project will bring additional housing units to the market; the extent to 33 which the proposed project will require the provision of additional 34 services, including, but not limited to additional educational, trans- 35 portation, police, emergency medical or fire services; and the extent to 36 which the proposed project will provide additional sources [or] of 37 revenue for municipalities and school districts. 38 § 9. Subdivision 5 of section 2302 of the public authorities law, as 39 amended by chapter 356 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as 40 follows: 41 5. The term "project" shall mean any land in one or more areas of the 42 city and within or outside or partially within and partially outside the 43 city and any building, structure, facility or other improvement thereon, 44 including, but not limited to machinery and equipment and all real and 45 personal properties deemed necessary in connection therewith, whether or 46 not now in existence or under construction, which shall be necessary or 47 suitable for industrial, warehousing, research, housing or commercial 48 purposes, or for use by a federal agency or a medical facility and which 49 may include or mean an industrial pollution control facility or a civic 50 facility, provided, however, the authority shall not provide financial 51 assistance in respect of any project wholly or partially outside the 52 city provided, however, that the authority may provide financial assist- 53 ance for such a project where a portion of the project outside the city 54 is contiguous to a portion of the project located within the city if the 55 authority obtains the prior consent thereto by the governing body or S. 256--A 6 1 bodies of all the other cities, towns or villages in which a part or 2 parts of the project is, or is to be, located. 3 § 10. The opening paragraph of section 2306 of the public authorities 4 law, as amended by chapter 304 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read 5 as follows: 6 The purposes of the authority shall be to promote, develop, encourage 7 and assist in the acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, 8 maintaining, equipping and furnishing industrial, manufacturing, ware- 9 house, commercial, housing, and research facilities and facilities for 10 use by a federal agency or a medical facility including industrial 11 pollution control facilities, which may include transportation facili- 12 ties including but not limited to those relating to water, highway, rail 13 and air, in one or more areas of the city, and thereby advance the job 14 opportunities, health, general prosperity and economic welfare of the 15 people of said city and to improve their medical care and standard of 16 living; provided, however, that the authority shall not undertake any 17 project if the completion thereof would result in the removal of an 18 industrial or manufacturing plant of the project occupant from one area 19 of the state to another area of the state or in abandonment of one or 20 more plants or facilities of the project applicant located within the 21 state, provided, however, that neither restriction shall apply if the 22 authority shall determine on the basis of the application before it that 23 the project is reasonably necessary to discourage the project occupant 24 from removing such other plant or facility to a location outside the 25 state or is reasonably necessary to preserve the competitive position of 26 the project occupant in its respective industry. Except as otherwise 27 provided for in this section, no financial assistance of the authority 28 shall be provided in respect of any project where facilities or property 29 that are primarily used in making retail sales to customers who 30 personally visit such facilities constitute more than one-third of the 31 total project cost. For the purposes of this article, "retail sales" 32 shall mean: (i) sales by a registered vendor under article twenty-eight 33 of the tax law primarily engaged in the retail sale of tangible personal 34 property, as defined in subparagraph (i) of paragraph four of subdivi- 35 sion (b) of section eleven hundred one of the tax law; or (ii) sales of 36 a service to such customers. Except, however, that tourism destination 37 projects shall not be prohibited by this paragraph. For the purpose of 38 this paragraph, "tourism destination" shall mean a location or facility 39 which is likely to attract a significant number of visitors from outside 40 the economic development region as established by section two hundred 41 thirty of the economic development law, in which the project is located. 42 § 11. Subdivision 1 of section 2315 of the public authorities law, as 43 amended by chapter 44 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as 44 follows: 45 1. The authority shall establish a uniform tax exemption policy, with 46 input from affected local taxing jurisdictions, which shall be applica- 47 ble to provisions of financial assistance pursuant to section twenty- 48 three hundred seven of this title and shall provide guidelines for the 49 claiming of real property, mortgage recording, and sales tax exemptions. 50 Such guidelines shall include, but not be limited to: period of 51 exemption; percentage of exemption; types of projects for which 52 exemptions may be claimed; procedures for payments in lieu of taxes and 53 instances in which real property appraisals are to be performed as a 54 part of an application for tax exemption; in addition, the authority in 55 adopting such policy shall consider such issues as: the extent to which 56 a project will create or retain permanent, private sector jobs; the S. 256--A 7 1 estimated value of any tax exemption to be provided; whether affected 2 tax jurisdictions should be reimbursed by the project occupant if a 3 project does not fulfill the purposes for which an exemption was 4 provided; the impact of a proposed project on existing and proposed 5 businesses and economic development projects in the vicinity; the amount 6 of private sector investment generated or likely to be generated by the 7 proposed project; the demonstrated public support for the proposed 8 project; the likelihood of accomplishing the proposed project in a time- 9 ly fashion; the effect of the proposed project upon the environment; the 10 extent to which the project will utilize, to the fullest extent practi- 11 cable and economically feasible, resource conservation, energy efficien- 12 cy, green technologies, and alternative and renewable energy measures; 13 the extent to which the project will provide onsite child care services 14 or otherwise facilitate new child care services; the extent to which the 15 project will bring additional housing units to the market; the extent to 16 which the proposed project will require the provision of additional 17 services, including, but not limited to additional educational, trans- 18 portation, police, emergency medical or fire services; and the extent to 19 which the proposed project will provide additional sources of revenue 20 for municipalities and school districts. 21 § 12. This act shall take effect immediately.